Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
RESIDENTIAL USE OF COMMERCIAL LANDS
SECTION 1. Section 2 of  this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 197.286 to
197.314.
SECTION 2. (1) Notwithstanding an acknowledged comprehensive plan or land use regu-
lations, within an urban growth boundary a local government shall allow,  on lands zoned to
allow only commercial uses and not industrial uses, the siting and development of:
(a) Residential structures subject to an affordable housing covenant as provided in ORS
456.270 to 456.295 making each unit affordable to a household with  income less than or equal
to 60 percent of the area median income as defined in ORS 456.270; or
(b) Mixed use structures  with ground floor commercial units and residential units subject
to an affordable housing covenant as provided in ORS 456.270 to 456.295 making the proper-
ties affordable to moderate income households, as defined in ORS 456.270.
(2) The local government may only apply those approval standards, conditions and  pro-
cedures under ORS 197.307, that would be applicable to the residential zone of the local gov-
ernment that is most comparable in density to the allowed commercial uses.
(3) Development under this section does not:
(a) Trigger any requirement that a local government consider or update an analysis as
required by a statewide planning goal relating to economic development.
(b) Apply on lands where the local government determines that:
(A) The development on the  property cannot be adequately served by water, sewer, storm
water drainage or streets, or  will not be adequately served at the time that development on
the lot is complete;
(B) The property contains a slope of 25 percent or greater;
(C) The property is within a 100-year floodplain; or
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 1
(D) The development of  the property is constrained by land use regulations based on
statewide land use planning goals relating to:
(i) Natural disasters and hazards; or
(ii) Natural resources, including air, water, land or  natural areas, but not including open
spaces.
(c) Apply on lands that are vacant or that were added to  the urban growth boundary
within the last 15 years.
RESIDENTIAL APPROVAL PROCEDURES
SECTION 3.
 ORS 215.427 is amended to read:
215.427. (1) Except as provided in subsections (3), (5) and (10) of  this section, for land within an
urban growth boundary and applications  for mineral aggregate extraction, the governing body of a
county or its designee shall take final action on an application for a permit, limited  land use deci-
sion or zone change, including resolution of all  appeals under ORS 215.422, within 120 days after the
application is deemed  complete. The governing body of a county or its designee shall take final
action on all other applications for a permit, limited land use decision or  zone change, including
resolution  of  all appeals under ORS 215.422, within 150 days after the application is deemed com-
plete, except as provided in subsections (3), (5) and (10) of this section.
(2) If an application for  a permit, limited land use decision or zone change is incomplete, the
governing body or its designee shall notify the applicant in writing  of exactly what information is
missing within 30 days of receipt of the  application and allow the applicant to submit the missing
information. The application shall be deemed complete for the purpose of subsection  (1) of this sec-
tion and ORS 197.311 upon receipt by the governing body or its designee of:
(a) All of the missing information;
(b) Some of the missing information and  written notice from the applicant that no other infor-
mation will be provided; or
(c) Written notice from the applicant that none of the missing information will be provided.
(3)(a) If the application was complete  when first submitted or the applicant submits additional
information, as described in subsection  (2) of this section, within 180 days of the date the application
was first submitted and  the county has a comprehensive plan and land use regulations acknowledged
under ORS 197.251, approval or denial of the application shall be  based upon the standards and
criteria that were applicable at the time the application was first submitted.
(b) If  the application is for industrial or traded sector development of a site identified under
section 12, chapter 800, Oregon Laws 2003, and proposes an amendment to the  comprehensive plan,
approval or denial of the application  must be based upon the standards and criteria that were ap-
plicable at the time the application was first submitted, provided the application  complies with
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(4) On the  181st day after first being submitted, the application is void if the applicant has been
notified of the missing information as required under subsection (2)  of this section and has not
submitted:
(a) All of the missing information;
(b) Some of the missing information and written notice that no other information  will be pro-
vided; or
(c) Written notice that none of the missing information will be provided.
(5) The period set in subsection (1) of  this section or the 100-day period set in ORS 197.311 may
be extended for a specified period of time at the written  request of the applicant. The total of all
extensions, except as provided in subsection (10) of this section for mediation, may not exceed 215
days.
(6) The period set in subsection (1) of this section applies:
(a) Only to decisions wholly within the authority and control of the governing body of  the
county; and
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 2
(b) Unless the parties have agreed to  mediation as described in subsection (10) of this section
or ORS 197.319 (2)(b).
(7) Notwithstanding subsection (6)  of this section, the period set in subsection (1) of this section
and the 100-day period set in ORS 197.311 do not apply to :
(a) A decision of the county making a change to an acknowledged  comprehensive plan or a land
use regulation that is submitted to the Director of the Department of Land Conservation and  De-
velopment under ORS 197.610[ .]; or
(b) A decision of a  county involving an application for the development of residential
structures within an urban growth  boundary, where the county has tentatively approved the
application and extends these periods by no more than seven  days in order to assure the
sufficiency of its final order.
(8) Except when an applicant requests an extension under subsection (5)  of this section, if the
governing body of the county or its designee does not take final action on an application  for a
permit, limited  land use decision or zone change within 120 days or 150 days, as applicable, after
the application is deemed complete, the  county shall refund to the applicant either the unexpended
portion of any  application fees or deposits previously paid or 50 percent of the total amount of such
fees or deposits, whichever is greater. The applicant is not  liable for additional governmental fees
incurred subsequent to the payment of such fees or  deposits. However, the applicant is responsible
for the costs of providing sufficient additional information to  address relevant issues identified in
the consideration of the application.
(9) A county may not compel an applicant to  waive the period set in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion or to waive  the provisions of subsection (8) of this section or ORS 197.311 or 215.429 as a
condition for taking any action on an application for a permit, limited land use decision  or zone
change except when such applications are filed concurrently and  considered jointly with a plan
amendment.
(10) The periods set forth in  subsections (1) and (5) of this section and ORS 197.311 may be ex-
tended by up to 90 additional days, if the applicant and the county agree that a  dispute concerning
the application will be mediated.
SECTION 4.  ORS 227.178 is amended to read:
227.178. (1) Except as provided in subsections (3), (5) and (11) of  this section, the governing body
of a city or its designee shall  take final action on an application for a permit, limited land use de-
cision or zone change, including resolution of all appeals  under ORS 227.180, within 120 days after
the application is deemed complete.
(2) If an application for a permit, limited land use decision or zone  change is incomplete, the
governing body or its designee shall  notify the applicant in writing of exactly what information is
missing within 30 days of receipt of the application and  allow the applicant to submit the missing
information. The application shall be  deemed complete for the purpose of subsection (1) of this sec-
tion or ORS 197.311 upon receipt by the governing body or its designee of:
(a) All of the missing information;
(b) Some of the missing information and written notice from  the applicant that no other infor-
mation will be provided; or
(c) Written notice from the applicant that none of the missing information will be provided.
(3)(a) If the application was complete when first submitted or the applicant submits the  re-
quested additional information within 180 days of the date the  application was first submitted and
the city has a comprehensive plan and land use regulations acknowledged under  ORS 197.251, ap-
proval or denial of the application shall be based upon the standards and criteria that  were appli-
cable at the time the application was first submitted.
(b) If the application is for industrial or traded sector development of a site identified  under
section 12, chapter 800, Oregon Laws 2003, and proposes an amendment to the  comprehensive plan,
approval or denial of the application must be based upon the standards  and criteria that were ap-
plicable at the  time the application was first submitted, provided the application complies with
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 3
(4) On the  181st day after first being submitted, the application is void if the applicant has been
notified of the missing information as required  under subsection (2) of this section and has not
submitted:
(a) All of the missing information;
(b) Some of the  missing information and written notice that no other information will be pro-
vided; or
(c) Written notice that none of the missing information will be provided.
(5) The 120-day period set in subsection (1) of this section  or the 100-day period set in ORS
197.311 may be extended for a specified period of time at the written request of the  applicant. The
total of all extensions, except as provided in subsection (11) of this section for mediation, may not
exceed 245 days.
(6) The 120-day period set in subsection (1) of this section applies:
(a) Only to decisions wholly within the authority and control of the governing body of  the city;
and
(b) Unless the parties have agreed to  mediation as described in subsection (11) of this section
or ORS 197.319 (2)(b).
(7) Notwithstanding subsection (6) of this section, the 120-day period set in subsection (1) of  this
section and the 100-day period set in ORS 197.311 do not apply to :
(a) A decision of the city making  a change to an acknowledged comprehensive plan or a land
use regulation  that is submitted to the Director of the Department of Land Conservation and De-
velopment under ORS 197.610[ .]; or
(b) A  decision of a city involving an application for the development of residential struc-
tures within an  urban growth boundary, where the city has tentatively approved the appli-
cation and extends these periods by no more than  seven days in order to assure the
sufficiency of its final order.
(8) Except when an applicant requests an extension under subsection (5)  of this section, if the
governing body of the city or its designee does not take final action  on an application for a permit,
limited land use decision or zone change within 120 days  after the application is deemed complete,
the city shall refund to the applicant,  subject to the provisions of subsection (9) of this section, ei-
ther the unexpended portion of any application  fees or deposits previously paid or 50 percent of the
total amount of such fees or deposits, whichever is greater. The  applicant is not liable for additional
governmental fees incurred subsequent to the payment  of such fees or deposits. However, the ap-
plicant is responsible for the costs of providing  sufficient additional information to address relevant
issues identified in the consideration of the application.
(9)(a) To obtain a refund under subsection (8) of this section, the applicant may either:
(A) Submit a  written request for payment, either by mail or in person, to the city or its designee;
or
(B) Include the amount claimed in a mandamus petition filed under  ORS 227.179. The court shall
award an amount owed under this section in its final order on the petition.
(b) Within seven calendar days  of receiving a request for a refund, the city or its designee shall
determine the amount of any refund owed. Payment, or notice that no payment  is due, shall be made
to the applicant within 30 calendar days of receiving the request. Any amount due and not  paid
within 30 calendar days of  receipt of the request shall be subject to interest charges at the rate of
one percent per month, or a portion thereof.
(c) If payment due  under paragraph (b) of this subsection is not paid within 120 days after the
city or its designee receives the  refund request, the applicant may file an action for recovery of the
unpaid refund. In an action brought by a person  under this paragraph, the court shall award to a
prevailing applicant, in addition to the relief provided  in this section, reasonable attorney fees and
costs at trial and on appeal. If the city or its designee prevails, the  court shall award reasonable
attorney fees and costs at trial and on appeal if the court finds the petition to be frivolous.
(10) A city may not compel an applicant to waive the 120-day period set in subsection (1) of this
section or to waive the provisions of subsection (8) of this section or ORS  197.311 or 227.179 as a
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 4
condition for taking any action on an application for a permit, limited land use decision  or zone
change except when such applications are filed concurrently and  considered jointly with a plan
amendment.
(11) The periods set forth in  subsections (1) and (5) of this section and ORS 197.311 may be ex-
tended by up to 90 additional days, if the applicant and the city agree that a dispute concerning the
application will be mediated.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 197.830 is amended to read:
197.830. (1) Review of land use decisions or limited land use decisions  under ORS 197.830 to
197.845 shall be commenced  by filing a notice of intent to appeal with the Land Use Board of Ap-
peals.
(2) Except as provided  in ORS 197.620, a person may petition the board for review of a land use
decision or limited land use decision if the person:
(a) Filed a notice of intent to appeal the decision as provided in subsection (1) of this  section;
and
(b) Appeared before the local government, special district or state agency orally or in writing.
(3) If a local government makes a  land use decision without providing a hearing, except as
provided under ORS 215.416 (11) or 227.175 (10), or the local government makes  a land use decision
that is  different from the proposal described in the notice of hearing to such a degree that the notice
of the proposed action  did not reasonably describe the local government’s final actions, a person
adversely affected by the decision may appeal the decision to the board under this section:
(a) Within 21 days of actual notice where notice is required; or
(b) Within 21 days of the date a person knew  or should have known of the decision where no
notice is required.
(4) If a local government makes a land use decision without a hearing pursuant to  ORS 215.416
(11) or 227.175 (10):
(a) A person who was not provided notice of the decision as required  under ORS 215.416 (11)(c)
or 227.175 (10)(c) may appeal the  decision to the board under this section within 21 days of receiving
actual notice of the decision.
(b) A person who  is not entitled to notice under ORS 215.416 (11)(c) or 227.175 (10)(c) but who
is adversely affected or aggrieved by the decision may appeal the decision to the board  under this
section within 21 days after the expiration of the period for filing a local appeal of the decision es-
tablished by the local government under ORS 215.416 (11)(a) or 227.175 (10)(a).
(c) A person who receives notice of  a decision made without a hearing under ORS 215.416 (11)
or 227.175 (10) may appeal the decision to  the board under this section within 21 days of receiving
actual notice of the nature of the decision, if the notice of the decision did not  reasonably describe
the nature of the decision.
(d) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of  this subsection, a person who receives notice of a
decision made without  a hearing under ORS 215.416 (11) or 227.175 (10) may not appeal the decision
to the board under this section.
(5) If a local government makes a limited land use  decision which is different from the proposal
described in the notice to such a degree that the notice of the proposed action did not  reasonably
describe the local government’s final  actions, a person adversely affected by the decision may appeal
the decision to the board under this section:
(a) Within 21 days of actual notice where notice is required; or
(b) Within 21 days of the date a person knew  or should have known of the decision where no
notice is required.
(6) The appeal periods described in subsections (3), (4) and (5) of this section:
(a) May not exceed three years after the date of  the decision, except as provided in paragraph
(b) of this subsection.
(b) May not exceed 10 years after the date of the decision if notice of a hearing or an adminis-
trative decision made pursuant to ORS 197.195 or 197.797 is required but has not been provided.
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 5
(7)(a) Within 21 days  after a notice of intent to appeal has been filed with the board under
subsection (1) of this section, any person described  in paragraph (b) of this subsection may intervene
in and be made a party to the review proceeding by filing  a motion to intervene and by paying a
filing fee of $100.
(b) Persons who may intervene in and be made a party to the review proceedings, as  set forth
in subsection (1) of this section, are:
(A) The applicant who initiated the action before the local government,  special district or state
agency;  or
(B) Persons who appeared before the local  government, special district or state agency, orally
or in writing.
(c) Failure to comply with the deadline or  to pay the filing fee set forth in paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall result in denial of a motion to intervene.
(8) If a state agency whose order, rule, ruling, policy or other action is at  issue is not a party
to the proceeding, it may file a brief with the board as if it were a party.  The brief shall be due on
the same date the respondent’s brief is due and shall be accompanied by a filing fee of $100.
(9) A notice of intent to  appeal a land use decision or limited land use decision shall be filed
not later than 21 days  after the date the decision sought to be reviewed becomes final. A notice of
intent to appeal plan and land use regulation amendments processed pursuant to ORS 197.610 to
197.625 shall  be filed not later than 21 days after notice of the decision sought to be reviewed is
mailed or otherwise submitted to parties entitled to notice under ORS 197.615. Failure  to include a
statement identifying when, how and to  whom notice was provided under ORS 197.615 does not
render the notice defective.  Copies of the notice of intent to appeal shall be served upon the local
government, special district or state agency and the applicant of  record, if any, in the local gov-
ernment, special district or state agency proceeding. The  notice shall be served and filed in the form
and manner prescribed by rule of the board and shall be  accompanied by a filing fee of $300. If a
petition for review is not filed with the board as required  in subsections (10) and (11) of this section,
the board shall award the filing fee to the local government, special district or state agency.
(10)(a) Within 21 days after service of the notice of intent to appeal, the local government, spe-
cial district or state agency shall transmit to the board the original or a certified copy of the entire
record of the proceeding under review. By stipulation  of all parties to the review proceeding the
record may be shortened. The board may require or  permit subsequent corrections to the record;
however, the board shall issue an order on a  motion objecting to the record within 60 days of re-
ceiving the motion. If the board  denies a petitioner’s objection to the record, the board may estab-
lish a new deadline for the petition for review to  be filed that may not be less than 14 days from
the later of the original deadline for the brief or the date of  denial of the petitioner’s record ob-
jection.
(b) Within 10 days after service of  a notice of intent to appeal, the board shall provide notice
to the petitioner and the  respondent of their option to enter into mediation pursuant to ORS 197.860.
Any person moving to intervene  shall be provided such notice within seven days after a motion to
intervene is filed. The notice required by this paragraph shall be  accompanied by a statement that
mediation information or assistance may  be obtained from the Department of Land Conservation and
Development.
(11) A petition for review of the land use decision or limited land use  decision and supporting
brief shall be filed with the board as required by the board under subsection (13) of this section.
(12) The petition shall include a copy of the decision sought to be reviewed and shall state:
(a) The facts that establish that the petitioner has standing.
(b) The date of the decision.
(c) The issues the petitioner seeks to have reviewed.
(13)(a) The board shall adopt rules establishing deadlines for filing petitions and briefs and for
oral argument.
(b) The local government or state agency may  withdraw its decision for purposes of re-
consideration at any time :
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 6
(A) Subsequent to the filing of a notice of intent ; and
(B) Prior to :
(i) The date set for filing the record[ ,]; or[ ,]
(ii) On appeal  of a decision under ORS 197.610 to 197.625  or relating to the development of
a residential structure , [ prior to ] the filing of the respondent’s brief[ , the local government or  state
agency may withdraw its decision for purposes of reconsideration ].
(c) If a local government or state  agency withdraws an order for purposes of reconsideration,
it shall, within such time as the board may  allow, affirm, modify or reverse its decision. If the
petitioner is dissatisfied  with the local government or agency action after withdrawal for purposes
of reconsideration, the petitioner may refile  the notice of intent and the review shall proceed upon
the revised order. An amended notice of intent is not required if the local government or state
agency, on reconsideration, affirms the order or modifies the order with only minor changes.
(14) The board  shall issue a final order within 77 days after the date of transmittal of the record.
If the order is not  issued within 77 days the applicant may apply in Marion County or the circuit
court of the county where the application was filed for a writ of mandamus to compel the board  to
issue a final order.
(15) Upon entry of its final order, the board:
(a) May, in its discretion,  award costs to the prevailing party including the cost of preparation
of the record if the prevailing party is the local government, special district or state agency whose
decision is under review.
(b) Shall award reasonable attorney fees  and expenses to the prevailing party against any other
party who the board finds presented  a position or filed any motion without probable cause to believe
the position or motion was well-founded in law or on factually supported information.
(c) Shall award costs and attorney fees to a party as provided in ORS 197.843.
(16) Orders issued under this section may be enforced in appropriate judicial proceedings.
(17)(a) The board shall provide for the publication of its  orders that are of general public in-
terest in the form  it deems best adapted for public convenience. The publications shall constitute
the official reports of the board.
(b) Any moneys collected or received from sales  by the board shall be paid into the Board
Publications Account established by ORS 197.832.
(18) Except for any sums  collected for publication of board opinions, all fees collected by the
board under this section that are not awarded as costs shall be paid  over to the State Treasurer to
be credited to the General Fund.
(19) The board shall track and report on its website:
(a) The number of reviews commenced, as described in subsection (1) of this  section, the number
of reviews commenced for which  a petition is filed under subsection (2) of this section and, in re-
lation to each of those numbers, the rate at which the  reviews result in a decision of the board to
uphold, reverse or remand the land use decision or limited land use decision. The  board shall track
and report reviews under this paragraph in categories established by the board.
(b) A list of petitioners, the  number of reviews commenced and the rate at which the petitioner’s
reviews have resulted in decisions of the board to uphold,  reverse or remand the land use decision
or limited land use decision.
(c) A list of respondents, the  number of reviews involving each respondent and the rate at which
reviews involving the respondent have resulted in decisions of the  board to uphold, reverse or re-
mand the land use decision or limited  land use decision. Additionally, when a respondent is the local
government that made the land use decision or limited land use  decision, the board shall track
whether the local government appears before the board.
(d) A list  of reviews, and a brief summary of the circumstances in each review, under which the
board exercises its discretion to require a  losing party to pay the attorney fees of the prevailing
party.
EMERGENCY SHELTER SITING
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 7
SECTION 6. Section 4, chapter 18, Oregon Laws 2021,  as amended by section 3, chapter
47, Oregon Laws 2022, is repealed.
SECTION 7.  Section 3, chapter 18, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) A local government  shall approve an application for the development or use of land
for an emergency shelter,  as defined in [ section 2 of this 2021 Act ] ORS 197.782, on any property,
notwithstanding this chapter or  ORS chapter  195, [ 197,] 197A, 215 or 227 or any statewide [ plan]
land use planning goal, rule of the Land Conservation and Development Commission or local  land
use regulation, zoning ordinance, regional framework plan, functional plan  or comprehensive plan,
if the emergency shelter:
(a) Includes sleeping and restroom facilities for clients;
(b) Will comply with applicable building codes;
(c) Is located inside an urban growth boundary or in an area zoned for rural  residential use as
defined in ORS 215.501;
(d) Will not result in the development of a new building that is sited within an area  designated
under a statewide planning  goal relating to natural disasters and hazards, including flood plains or
mapped environmental health hazards, unless the development complies with regulations  directly
related to the hazard;
(e) Has adequate transportation access to commercial and medical services; and
(f) Will not pose any unreasonable risk to public health or safety.
(2) An emergency shelter allowed under this section must be operated by:
(a) A local government as defined in ORS 174.116;
(b) An organization  with at least two years’ experience operating an emergency shelter using
best practices that is:
(A) A local housing authority as defined in ORS 456.375;
(B) A religious corporation as defined in ORS 65.001; or
(C) A public benefit corporation, as defined in ORS 65.001, whose  charitable purpose includes
the support of  homeless individuals, that has been recognized as exempt from income tax under
section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue  Code [ on or before January 1, 2018 ] for at least three years
before the date of the application for a shelter ; or
(c) A nonprofit corporation partnering with any other entity described in this subsection.
(3) An emergency shelter approved under this section:
(a) May provide on-site for its clients and at no cost to the clients:
(A) Showering or bathing;
(B) Storage for personal property;
(C) Laundry facilities;
(D) Service of food prepared on-site or off-site;
(E) Recreation areas for children and pets;
(F) Case management services for housing, financial, vocational, educational or physical or be-
havioral health care services; or
(G) Any other services incidental to shelter.
(b) May include youth  shelters, winter or warming shelters, day shelters and family violence
shelter homes as defined in ORS 409.290.
(4) An emergency  shelter approved under this section may also provide additional services not
described in subsection (3) of this section  to individuals who are transitioning from unsheltered
homeless status. An organization providing services under this subsection may charge a fee of no
more than $300 per month per client  and only to clients who are financially able to pay the fee and
who request the services.
(5)(a) The approval or denial of an  emergency shelter under this section may be made without
a hearing. Whether or not a hearing is held,  the approval or denial  is not a land use decision
and is subject to review only under ORS 34.010 to 34.100.
(b) A reviewing court shall award attorney fees to:
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 8
(A) A local government, and any intervening  applicant, that prevails on the appeal of a
local government’s approval; and
(B) An applicant that prevails on an appeal of a local government’s denial.
(6) An application for an emergency shelter is not subject to approval under  this section
if, at the time of filing, the  most recently completed point-in-time count, as reported to the
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development under 24 C.F.R. part 578, in-
dicated that the  total sheltered and unsheltered homeless population was less than 0.18 per-
cent of the state population, based on the latest estimate from the Portland  State University
Population Research Center.
SINGLE EXIT MULTIFAMILY DWELLINGS
SECTION 8.
On or before October 1,  2025, the Department of Consumer and Business
Services shall  review and consider updates to the State of Oregon Structural Specialty Code
through the Building Codes Structures Board established under  ORS 455.132, to allow a res-
idential occupancy to be served by a single  exit, consistent with the following policies of this
state:
(1) The reduction, to the extent  practicable, of costs and barriers to the construction of
midsize multifamily dwellings, including those offering family-size  housing with sprinklers
on smaller lots, while maintaining safety, public health and the general welfare  with respect
to construction and occupancy.
(2) Encouraging a variety  of less expensive housing types that allow single-exit residen-
tial buildings under certain circumstances consistent with other adopted building codes.
(3) In adopting or considering updates to the building code under  this section, the de-
partment shall consider  regional variation in firefighting capacity and equipment and may
make amendments to the code contingent upon a certification by a local fire official that the
municipality has sufficient firefighting capacity and equipment.
PLANNED COMMUNITY ACT EXEMPTIONS
SECTION 9.
 ORS 94.550 is amended to read:
94.550. As used in ORS 94.550 to 94.783:
(1) “Assessment” means any charge imposed or levied  by a homeowners association on or
against an owner or lot pursuant to the provisions of  the declaration or the bylaws of the planned
community or provisions of ORS 94.550 to 94.783.
(2) “Blanket encumbrance”  means a trust deed or mortgage or any other lien or encumbrance,
mechanic’s lien or otherwise, securing or evidencing the  payment of money and affecting more than
one lot in  a planned community, or an agreement affecting more than one lot by which the developer
holds such planned community under an option, contract to sell or trust agreement.
(3) “Class I planned community” means a planned community that:
(a) Contains at  least 13 lots or in which the declarant has reserved the right to increase the
total number of lots beyond 12; and
(b) Has an estimated  annual assessment, including an amount required for reserves under ORS
94.595, exceeding $10,000 for all lots or $100 per lot based on:
(A) For a planned community created on or after January 1, 2002, the initial estimated  annual
assessment, including a constructive assessment based on a  subsidy of the association through a
contribution of funds, goods or services by the declarant; or
(B) For a planned community  created before January 1, 2002, a reasonable estimate of the cost
of fulfilling existing obligations imposed by the declaration, bylaws or other governing  document as
of January 1, 2002.
(4) “Class II planned community” means a planned community that:
(a) Is not a Class I planned community;
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 9
(b) Contains at least five lots; and
(c) Has an estimated annual assessment exceeding $1,000 for all lots based on:
(A) For a planned community created on or after January 1, 2002, the initial estimated  annual
assessment, including a constructive assessment based on a  subsidy of the association through a
contribution of funds, goods or services by the declarant; or
(B) For a planned community  created before January 1, 2002, a reasonable estimate of the cost
of fulfilling existing obligations imposed by the declaration, bylaws or other governing  document as
of January 1, 2002.
(5) “Class III planned community” means a  planned community that is not a Class I or II
planned community.
(6) “Common expenses” means  expenditures made by or financial liabilities incurred by the
homeowners association and includes any allocations to the reserve account under ORS 94.595.
(7) “Common property” means any  real property or interest in real property within a planned
community which is owned, held or leased by the homeowners  association or owned as tenants in
common by the lot owners, or designated in  the declaration or the plat for transfer to the associ-
ation.
(8) “Condominium” means property submitted to the provisions of ORS chapter 100.
(9) “Declarant” means any  person who creates a planned community under ORS 94.550 to 94.783.
(10) “Declarant control” means any special declarant right relating to administrative  control of
a homeowners association, including but not limited to:
(a) The right of the declarant or person designated by the declarant to appoint or remove an
officer or a member of the board of directors;
(b) Any weighted vote or special voting right granted to a declarant or to units owned  by the
declarant so that the declarant  will hold a majority of the voting rights in the association by virtue
of such weighted vote or special voting right; and
(c) The right of the declarant to exercise powers and responsibilities otherwise assigned by the
declaration  or  bylaws or by the provisions of ORS 94.550 to 94.783 to the association, officers of the
association or board of directors of the association.
(11) “Declaration” means the instrument described in ORS 94.580 which establishes a planned
community, and any amendments to the instrument.
(12) “Electric vehicle charging station” or “charging station” means a facility designed to de-
liver electrical current for the purpose of charging one or more electric motor vehicles.
(13) “Electronic meeting” means a meeting that  is conducted through telephone, teleconference,
video conference, web conference or any other live electronic means where  at least one participant
is not physically present.
(14) “Governing document” means articles of incorporation, bylaws, a  declaration or a rule,
regulation or resolution that was properly adopted by the homeowners  association or any other in-
strument or plat relating to common ownership  or common maintenance of a portion of a planned
community that is binding upon lots within the planned community.
(15) “Governing entity” means an  incorporated or unincorporated association, committee, person
or any other entity that has authority under a governing  document to maintain commonly main-
tained property, to impose assessments on lots or to act on  matters of common concern on behalf
of lot owners within the planned community.
(16) “Homeowners association” or “association” means  the organization of owners of lots in a
planned community, created under ORS 94.625, required by a governing document or  formed under
ORS 94.574.
(17) “Majority” or “majority of votes” or “majority of owners” means more than 50 percent of
the votes in the planned community.
(18) “Mortgagee” means any person who is:
(a) A mortgagee under a mortgage;
(b) A beneficiary under a trust deed; or
(c) The vendor under a land sale contract.
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 10
(19) “Owner” means the owner of any lot in a planned community,  unless otherwise specified,
but does not include a person holding only a security interest in a lot.
(20) “Percent of owners” or “percentage  of owners” means the owners representing the specified
voting rights as determined under ORS 94.658.
(21)(a) “Planned  community” means any subdivision under ORS 92.010 to 92.192 that results in
a pattern of ownership of  real property and all the buildings, improvements and rights located on
or belonging  to the real property, in which the owners collectively are responsible for the mainte-
nance, operation, insurance or other expenses relating to any property within the  planned commu-
nity, including common property, if any, or for  the exterior maintenance of any property that is
individually owned.
(b) “Planned community” does not mean:
(A) A condominium under ORS chapter 100;
(B) A subdivision that is exclusively commercial or industrial; [ or]
(C) A timeshare plan under ORS 94.803 to 94.945[ .]; or
(D) A development established on or  after January 1, 2024, in which each residential unit
is either:
(i) Subject to an affordability  restriction, including an affordable housing covenant, as
defined in ORS 456.270; or
(ii) Owned by a public benefit or religious nonprofit corporation.
(22) “Purchaser”  means any person other than a declarant who, by means of a voluntary trans-
fer, acquires a legal or equitable interest in a lot, other than as security for an obligation.
(23) “Purchaser for resale” means any person who purchases from the declarant more  than two
lots for the purpose of resale whether or not  the purchaser for resale makes improvements to the
lots before reselling them.
(24) “Recorded declaration” means an instrument recorded with the  recording officer of the
county in which the planned community is located that contains covenants, conditions and  re-
strictions that are binding upon lots in the planned community or  that impose servitudes on the real
property.
(25) “Special declarant  rights” means any rights, in addition to the rights of the declarant as a
lot owner, reserved  for the benefit of the declarant under the declaration or ORS 94.550 to 94.783,
including but not limited to:
(a) Constructing or completing construction of improvements in the planned community  which
are described in the declaration;
(b) Expanding the planned community or  withdrawing property from the planned community
under ORS 94.580 (3) and (4);
(c) Converting lots into common property;
(d) Making the planned community subject to a master association under ORS 94.695; or
(e) Exercising any right of declarant control reserved under ORS 94.600.
(26) “Successor declarant” means the transferee of any special declarant right.
(27) “Turn over” means the act of turning over administrative responsibility pursuant to ORS
94.609 and 94.616.
(28) “Unit” means a building or portion of a building located upon a lot in a  planned community
and designated for separate occupancy or ownership, but does  not include any building or portion
of a building located on common property.
(29) “Votes” means the votes allocated to lots in the declaration under ORS 94.580 (2).
REGULATION OF CONDOMINIUMS
SECTION 10.
 ORS 100.015 is amended to read:
100.015. The Real Estate Commissioner has the exclusive right to regulate the  submission
of property to the provisions of this chapter and  may adopt such rules as are necessary for the
administration of this chapter.
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 11
SECTION 11.  ORS 100.022 is amended to read:
100.022. [(1)] Except as provided under  ORS 100.015 or explicitly required or allowed under
this chapter,  a zoning, subdivision,  building code or other [ real property law, ] regulation by a
public body, agency rule or local  ordinance or regulation may not [ prohibit]:
(1) Have the effect of prohibiting or restricting  the condominium form of ownership ; or
(2) Impose any restriction or  requirement upon a structure , property or development that is
submitted or proposed to be submitted to  the condominium form of ownership under this chapter
that it would not impose upon a structure or development  under a different form of ownership[ .],
including:
(a) Any charge, tax or fee;
(b) A review or approval process  by any person of a declaration, bylaw, plat, articles of
incorporation, regulation, resolution or any other document relating to  the condominium or
the submission of the property or development to the condominium form of ownership;
(c) Any additional permitting requirements or conditions  of approval of the property or
development; or
(d) Any other requirements.
[(2) Except as set forth in this section, no provision of this chapter invalidates  or modifies any
provision of any zoning, subdivision,  building code or other real property use law, ordinance or regu-
lation.]
[(3) Subsection (1) of This section does not prohibit any governmental approval  required under this
chapter.]
SECTION 12.
 ORS 100.110 is amended to read:
100.110. (1)(a) Before a declaration, supplemental declaration or an amendment thereto may  be
recorded, it must be approved as provided in this section by the county  assessor of the county in
which the property is located and the Real Estate Commissioner.
(b) Before a declaration, supplemental declaration or, if required under subsection  (3) of this
section, an amendment thereto may be recorded, it must be approved by the tax collector  of the
county in which the property is located.
(c) A declaration, supplemental declaration or amendment thereto may  not be approved unless
the requirements of subsections (2) to  (7) of this section are met. Approval must be evidenced by
execution of the declaration or amendment or by a written approval attached thereto.
(d) If the requirements of subsections (2) to (7) of this section are met, the  commissioner, county
assessor and tax collector, if applicable ,[:]
[(A)] shall approve the declaration, supplemental declaration or amendment[ ; and ]
[(B) May not impose additional requirements not specified in subsections (2) to (7) of this
section].
(2) The county  assessor of the county in which the property is located shall approve a declara-
tion, supplemental declaration or amendment thereto if:
(a) The name complies with ORS 100.105 (5) and (6); and
(b) The plat complies with the requirements of ORS 100.115 or the plat amendment complies with
ORS 100.116.
(3) The tax collector of the county in which the property is located shall approve the declaration
or supplemental declaration, or an amendment that adds property to the  condominium, changes the
boundary of a unit or creates  an additional unit from all or parts of other units or from all or parts
of other units and common elements for which a plat amendment is required under ORS 100.116, if:
(a) All ad valorem taxes, special assessments, fees, or other charges required by law to be placed
upon the tax roll for the affected units that have or will become a lien  upon the property during the
tax year have been paid;
(b) Advance payment of ad valorem  taxes, special assessments, fees or other charges for the
affected units that are not on the tax roll  and for which payment is required under paragraph (a)
of this subsection has been made to the tax collector  utilizing the procedures contained in ORS
92.095 and 311.370; and
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 12
(c) The additional taxes, penalty, and any interest attributable thereto, required because  of dis-
qualification of the affected units from any special assessment have been paid.
(4) Subject to subsection (6)  of this section, the commissioner shall approve the declaration or
amendment thereto if:
(a) The declaration or the amendment thereto complies with the requirements of  ORS 100.105
and 100.135 and other provisions of this chapter;
(b) The bylaws adopted under ORS  100.410 comply with the requirements of ORS 100.410 and
100.415 and other provisions of this chapter;
(c) The  plat complies with the requirements of ORS 100.115 or the plat amendment complies with
ORS 100.116 and other provisions of this chapter;
(d) The declaration is for a conversion condominium and the declarant has submitted:
(A) An affidavit that the notice of conversion was given in accordance with ORS 100.305  and
that the notice period has expired;
(B) An affidavit that  the notice of conversion was given in accordance with ORS 100.305 and
copies of the written consent of any tenants as provided in ORS 100.305  (6) or a signed statement
that no tenants were entitled to notice under ORS 100.305; or
(C) Any applicable combination of the  requirements of subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this para-
graph;
(e) A copy  of the plat executed by the declarant and prepared in conformance with ORS 100.115
or plat amendment prepared in conformance with ORS 100.116 is submitted;
(f) A certification of plat  execution, on a form prescribed and furnished by the commissioner, is:
(A) Executed by the declarant, the professional land  surveyor who signed the surveyor’s certif-
icate on the plat, the attorney for the declarant, a representative of the title insurance company that
issued the information required  under ORS 100.640 (1)(e) or 100.668 (2)(d) or another person au-
thorized by the declarant in writing to execute the certification; and
(B) Submitted stating that the copy is a true copy of the plat signed by the declarant; and
(g) A copy of a reserve study has been submitted, if a  disclosure statement was issued under
ORS 100.655 and the reserve study was not included pursuant to ORS 100.640 (1)(g).
(5) The commissioner shall approve a supplemental declaration if:
(a) The supplemental declaration complies with the requirements of  ORS 100.120 and other
provisions of this chapter;
(b) The supplemental plat complies with the requirements of ORS 100.115;
(c) The  supplemental declaration is for a conversion condominium and the declarant has com-
plied with the requirements of subsection (4)(d) of this section; and
(d) A copy of the supplemental  plat and a certification of plat execution described in subsection
(4)(e) and (f) of this section have been submitted.
(6) Approval by the  commissioner is not required for an amendment to a declaration transferring
the right of use of a limited common element pursuant to ORS 100.515 (5).
(7) Before the commissioner approves the declaration, supplemental declaration or amendment
thereto under this section:
(a) The declarant or other person requesting approval shall  pay to the commissioner a fee de-
termined by the commissioner under ORS 100.670; and
(b) For an amendment or supplemental declaration, the Condominium Information Report and
the Annual Report described in ORS 100.260 must  be designated current by the Real Estate Agency
as provided in ORS 100.255 and the fee required under ORS 100.670 must be paid.
(8) If the declaration, supplemental declaration or  amendment thereto approved by the commis-
sioner under subsection (4) or (5) of  this section is not recorded in accordance with ORS 100.115
within one year from the date of approval by the  commissioner, the approval automatically expires
and the declaration, supplemental declaration or amendment thereto  must be resubmitted for ap-
proval in accordance with this section. The commissioner’s approval must set  forth the date on
which the approval expires.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 100.115 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 13
100.115. (1) A plat of the land described in the declaration or a supplemental plat  described in
a supplemental declaration, complying with ORS 92.050,  92.060 (1) and (2), 92.080 and 92.120, shall
be recorded simultaneously  with the declaration or supplemental declaration. The plat or supple-
mental plat shall be titled in accordance with subsection (3) of this section and shall:
(a) Show the location of:
(A) All buildings  and public roads. The location shall be referenced to a point on the boundary
of the property; and
(B) For a condominium  containing units described in ORS 100.020 (3)(b)(C) or (D), the moorage
space or floating  structure. The location shall be referenced to a point on the boundary of the up-
land property regardless of a change in the location resulting from a fluctuation in  the water level
or flow.
(b) Show the designation, location, dimensions and area in square feet of each unit including:
(A) For units in a building described in ORS 100.020  (3)(b)(A), the horizontal and vertical
boundaries of  each unit and the common elements to which each unit has access. The vertical
boundaries shall be referenced to  a known benchmark elevation or other reference point as ap-
proved by the city or county surveyor;
(B) For a space described in ORS 100.020  (3)(b)(B), the horizontal boundaries of each unit and
the common elements to  which each unit has access. If the space is located within a structure, the
vertical boundaries also shall be shown and referenced to a known benchmark elevation  or other
reference point as approved by the city or county surveyor;
(C) For a moorage space described in ORS 100.020 (3)(b)(C),  the horizontal boundaries of each
unit and the common elements to which each unit has access; and
(D) For a floating structure described in ORS 100.020 (3)(b)(D), the horizontal and vertical
boundaries of each unit and the common elements to which each unit has access. The  vertical
boundaries shall be referenced to an assumed elevation of  an identified point on the floating struc-
ture even though the assumed elevation may change with the fluctuation of the water level where
the floating structure is moored.
(c) Identify and show, to the extent feasible, the location and dimensions of  all limited common
elements described in the declaration. The plat may not include any statement  indicating to which
unit the use of any noncontiguous limited common element is reserved.
(d) Include a statement,  including signature and official seal, of a registered architect, registered
professional  land  surveyor or registered professional engineer certifying that the plat fully and ac-
curately depicts the boundaries of  the units of the building and that construction of the units and
buildings as depicted on  the plat has been completed, except that the professional land surveyor who
prepared the plat need not affix a seal to the statement.
(e) Include a surveyor’s certificate, complying with  ORS 92.070, that includes information in the
declaration in accordance with ORS 100.105 (1)(a) and  a metes and bounds description or other de-
scription approved by the city or county surveyor.
(f) Include a statement by the declarant that the property and improvements described  and de-
picted on the plat are subject to the provisions of ORS 100.005 to 100.627.
[(g) Include such signatures of approval as may be required by local ordinance or regulation. ]
[(h)] (g)  Include any other  information or data not inconsistent with the declaration that the
declarant desires to include.
[(i)] (h)  If the condominium is a flexible condominium, show the location and dimensions of  all
variable property identified in the declaration and label  the variable property as
“WITHDRAWABLE VARIABLE PROPERTY” or “NONWITHDRAWABLE VARIABLE
PROPERTY,” with a letter different from those designating a unit, building  or other tract of vari-
able property. If there is more than one tract, each tract shall be labeled in the same manner.
(2) The supplemental plat required under ORS 100.150 (1)  shall be recorded simultaneously with
the supplemental declaration. The  supplemental plat shall be titled in accordance with subsection
(3) of this section and shall:
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 14
(a) Comply with ORS 92.050, 92.060 (1), (2) and (4), 92.080, 92.120  and subsection (3) of this sec-
tion.
(b) If any property is withdrawn:
(A) Show the resulting perimeter boundaries of the condominium after the withdrawal; and
(B) Show the information required under subsection [ (1)(i)] (1)(h) of this section as it relates  to
any remaining variable property.
(c) If any property is reclassified, show the information required under  subsection (1)(a) to (d)
of this section.
(d) Include a “Declarant’s Statement” that the property described on the supplemental  plat is
reclassified or withdrawn from the condominium and that  the condominium exists as described and
depicted on the plat.
(e) Include a surveyor’s certificate complying with ORS 92.070.
(3) The title of each supplemental  plat described in ORS 100.120 shall include the complete name
of the condominium, followed by the additional language specified in this subsection and the  appro-
priate reference to the stage being  annexed or tract of variable property being reclassified. Each
supplemental plat for a condominium recorded on or after January 1, 2002, shall be  numbered se-
quentially and shall:
(a) If property is annexed under  ORS 100.125, include the words “Supplemental Plat No.
: Annexation of Stage ”; or
(b) If  property is reclassified under ORS 100.150, include the words “Supplemental Plat No.
: Reclassification of Variable Property, Tract .”
(4) Upon request of the county surveyor or assessor, the person offering a plat or  supplemental
plat for recording shall also  file an exact copy, certified by the surveyor who made the plat to be
an exact copy of the  plat, with the county assessor and the county surveyor. The exact copy shall
be made on suitable drafting material having the characteristics of strength, stability and transpar-
ency required by the county surveyor.
(5) Before a  plat or a supplemental plat may be recorded, it must be approved by the city or
county surveyor as provided in ORS 92.100. Before approving  the plat as required by this section,
the city or county surveyor shall:
(a) Check the boundaries of the plat and units and take measurements and  make computations
necessary to determine that the plat complies with this section.
(b) Determine that the name complies with ORS 100.105 (5) and (6).
(c) Determine that the following are consistent:
(A) The designation and area in square feet of each unit  shown on the plat and the unit desig-
nations and areas contained in the declaration in accordance with ORS 100.105 (1)(d);
(B) Limited  common elements identified on the plat and the information contained in the decla-
ration in accordance with ORS 100.105 (1)(h);
(C) The description of the property  in the surveyor’s certificate included on the plat and the
description contained in the declaration in accordance with ORS 100.105 (1)(a); and
(D) For a flexible condominium, the variable property depicted on the plat  and the identification
of the property contained in the declaration in accordance with ORS 100.105 (7)(c).
(6) The person offering the plat or supplemental plat for approval shall:
(a) Submit a copy of the proposed  declaration and bylaws or applicable supplemental declaration
at the time the plat is submitted; and
(b) Submit the original  or a copy of the executed declaration and bylaws or the applicable sup-
plemental declaration approved by the commissioner if required by law prior to approval.
(7) For performing the services described in subsection (5)(a) to (c) of this section, the city  sur-
veyor or county surveyor shall collect from the person offering the plat for approval a fee of  $150
plus $25 per building. The governing body of a city or county may establish a higher fee by  resol-
ution or order.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 100.105 is amended to read:
100.105. (1) A declaration must contain:
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 15
(a) A description of the property, including property on which a unit or a limited  common ele-
ment is located, whether held in fee simple,  leasehold, easement or other interest or combination
thereof, that is  being submitted to the condominium form of ownership and that conforms to the
description in the surveyor’s certificate provided under ORS 100.115 (1).
(b) Subject to subsection (11) of this  section, a statement of the interest in the property being
submitted to the condominium form  of ownership, whether fee simple, leasehold, easement or other
interest or combination thereof.
(c) Subject to subsections (5) and (6) of this section, the name by which  the property is known
and a general description of each unit and the building or buildings, including the number of stories
and basements of each building, the total number of  units and the principal materials of which they
are constructed.
(d) The unit designation, a statement that the location  of each unit is shown on the plat, a de-
scription of the boundaries and area in square feet of  each unit and any other data necessary for
proper identification.  The area of a unit must be the same as shown for that unit on the plat de-
scribed in ORS 100.115 (1).
(e) A notice in substantially the following form in at least  12-point type in all capitals or bold-
face:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
NOTICE
THE SQUARE FOOTAGE AREAS STATED IN THIS DECLARATION AND  THE PLAT ARE
BASED ON THE BOUNDARIES OF THE UNITS AS DESCRIBED  IN THIS DECLARATION AND
MAY VARY FROM THE AREA OF UNITS CALCULATED FOR OTHER PURPOSES.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(f) A description of the general common elements.
(g) An allocation to each unit of an undivided  interest in the common elements in accordance
with ORS 100.515 and the method used to establish the allocation.
(h) The designation of any limited common elements including:
(A) A general statement of the nature of the limited common element;
(B) A statement of the unit to which the use of each limited common  element is reserved, pro-
vided the statement is not a reference to an assignment of use specified on the plat; and
(C) The allocation of use of any limited common element appertaining to more than one unit.
(i) The method of determining liability for common expenses and right to common profits in  ac-
cordance with ORS 100.530.
(j) The voting rights allocated to each unit  in accordance with ORS 100.525 or, in the case of
condominium units committed as property in  a timeshare plan defined in ORS 94.803, the voting
rights allocated in the timeshare instrument.
(k) A statement of the general nature of  use, residential or otherwise, for which the building
or buildings and each of the units is intended.
(L) A statement that  the designated agent to receive service of process in cases provided in ORS
100.550 (1) is named  in the Condominium Information Report which will be filed with the Real Estate
Agency in accordance with ORS 100.250 (1)(a).
(m) The method of amending the declaration and the percentage of  voting rights required to
approve an amendment of the declaration in accordance with ORS 100.135.
(n) A statement as to whether or not the association of unit owners pursuant to  ORS 100.405
(5) and (8) has authority to grant leases, easements, rights of  way, licenses and other similar inter-
ests affecting the general and limited common elements of the condominium and consent  to vacation
of roadways within and adjacent to the condominium.
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 16
(o) If the condominium contains a floating structure  described in ORS 100.020 (3), a statement
regarding the authority of the  board of directors of the association, subject to ORS 100.410, to
temporarily relocate the floating structure without a majority vote of affected unit owners.
(p) Any restrictions on alienation of units. Any such restrictions created  by documents other
than the  declaration may be incorporated by reference in the declaration to the official records of
the county in which the property is located.
(q) Any other details regarding the property that the person executing  the declaration considers
desirable. However, if a provision required to be in the bylaws under ORS 100.415 is included in the
declaration, the voting requirements for amending the bylaws also  govern the amendment of the
provision in the declaration.
(2) In the event the declarant proposes to annex additional property  to the condominium under
ORS 100.125, the declaration also must contain a general description of the  plan of development,
including:
(a) The maximum number of units to be included in the condominium.
(b) The date after which any right to annex additional property will terminate.
(c) A general description of the nature and proposed use of any additional common elements
which declarant proposes  to annex to the condominium, if such common elements might substan-
tially increase the proportionate amount of the common expenses payable by existing unit owners.
(d) A statement that the method used to establish the allocation of undivided interest in  the
common elements, the method used to determine liability for common expenses and right to  common
profits and the method used  to allocate voting rights for each unit annexed is as stated in the dec-
laration in accordance with subsection (1)(g), (i) and (j) of this section.
(e) Such other information as  the Real Estate Commissioner requires in order to carry out the
purposes of this chapter.
(3) Unless  expressly prohibited by the declaration and subject to the requirements of ORS
100.135 (2) and subsections (9) and (10) of this section:
(a) Not later than two years following the termination date specified in subsection (2)(b)  of this
section, the termination date may be extended for a period not exceeding five years.
(b) Before the  termination date specified in the declaration or supplemental declaration under
subsection (7)(d) of this section, the termination date may be extended for a period not exceeding
five years.
(c) The general  description under subsection (2)(c) of this section and the information included
in the declaration or supplemental  declaration in accordance with subsection (7)(c), (g) and (h) of
this section may be changed by an amendment to  the declaration or supplemental declaration and
plat or supplemental plat.
(4) The information included  in the declaration or supplemental declaration in accordance with
subsection (2)(a) and (d) of this section and subsection  (7)(a), (b), (e), (f) and (k) of this section may
not be changed unless all owners agree to the change and an amendment to the declaration or
supplemental declaration and,  if applicable, the plat or supplemental plat are recorded in accordance
with this chapter.
(5) The  name of the property shall include the word “condominium” or “condominiums” or the
words “a condominium.”
(6) A condominium  may not bear a name which is the same as or deceptively similar to the name
of any other , different  condominium located in the same county.
(7) If the condominium is a  flexible condominium containing variable property, the declaration
shall also contain a general description of the plan of development, including:
(a) A statement that the rights provided for under ORS 100.150 (1) are being reserved.
(b) A statement:
(A) Of any limitations on rights reserved under ORS 100.150 (1),  including whether the consent
of any unit owner is required, and if so, a statement of the method by which the consent is  ascer-
tained; or
(B) That there are no limitations on rights reserved under ORS 100.150 (1).
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 17
(c) A statement of the total number of tracts of variable property  within the condominium, in-
cluding:
(A) A designation of each tract as withdrawable variable property  or nonwithdrawable variable
property;
(B) Identification of each  variable  tract by a label in  accordance with ORS 100.115 [ (1)(i)]
(1)(h);
(C) A  statement of the method of labeling each tract depicted on the plat in accordance with
ORS 100.115 [ (1)(i)] (1)(h); and
(D) A statement of the total number of tracts of each type of variable property.
(d) The termination date, which is the date  after which any right reserved under ORS 100.150
(1) will terminate, and a statement of the circumstances, if any, that will terminate any right on or
before the date specified. Subject to ORS 100.120,  the termination date from the date of recording
of the  conveyance of the first unit in the condominium to a person other than the declarant may
not exceed:
(A) Twenty years, only if a condominium consists, or may consist if the condominium is a flexi-
ble condominium, exclusively of units to be used for nonresidential purposes; or
(B) Seven years.
(e) The maximum number of units that may be created.
(f) A statement that the method used  to establish the allocations of undivided interest in the
common elements, the method used to determine liability for common expenses and right to  common
profits and the method used to allocate voting rights as additional units are created is the same as
stated in the declaration in accordance with subsection (1)(g), (i) and (j) of this section.
(g) A general description of all existing improvements and the nature and proposed use of  any
improvements that may be made  on variable property if the improvements might substantially in-
crease the proportionate amount of the common expenses payable by existing unit owners.
(h) A statement of whether or not the declarant  reserves the right to create limited common
elements within any variable property, and if so, a general description of  the types that may be
created.
(i) A statement that the plat shows the location and dimensions of all withdrawable  variable
property that is labeled “WITHDRAWABLE VARIABLE PROPERTY.”
(j) A statement that if by the termination date all or a portion of the withdrawable variable
property has not been withdrawn or reclassified, the withdrawable variable  property is automat-
ically withdrawn from the condominium as of the termination date.
(k) A statement of the rights of the association under ORS 100.155 (2).
(L) A statement of whether or not all or any portion of the variable property  may not be with-
drawn from the condominium and, if so, with respect to the nonwithdrawable variable property:
(A) A statement  that the plat shows the location and dimensions of all nonwithdrawable variable
property that is labeled “NONWITHDRAWABLE VARIABLE PROPERTY.”
(B) A description of all improvements  that may be made and a statement of the intended use
of each improvement.
(C) A statement that, if by the termination date all or a portion  of the variable property desig-
nated as “nonwithdrawable variable property” has not been reclassified, the property  is automat-
ically reclassified as of the termination date as a general common element of the  condominium and
any interest  in the property held for security purposes is automatically extinguished by the classi-
fication.
(D) A statement of the rights of the association under ORS 100.155 (3).
(m) A statement by the local governing body  or appropriate department thereof that the with-
drawal of any variable property designated as “withdrawable variable property” in  the declaration
in accordance with paragraph (L) of this subsection, will not violate any applicable planning or
zoning regulation or ordinance. The statement may be attached as an exhibit to the declaration.
(8) The plan of development for any variable property included in the declaration or  any sup-
plemental declaration of any stage in accordance with  subsection (7) of this section is subject to any
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 18
plan of development included in the declaration in accordance with subsection (2)  of this section,
except that the time limitation specified in subsection (7)(d) of this section governs any right  re-
served under ORS 100.150 (1) with respect to any variable property.
(9) The  information included in the declaration in accordance with subsection (7)(j), (k) and (m)
of this section may not be deleted by amendment.
(10)(a) Approval by the unit owners is not required  for a declarant to redesignate withdrawable
variable property as “nonwithdrawable variable  property” under ORS 100.150 (1) by supplemental
declaration and supplemental plat, for any reason, including if  the redesignation is required by the
local governing body to comply with any planning or zoning regulation or ordinance.
(b) If as a result of a redesignation under paragraph (a) of this subsection,  the information re-
quired to be included  in the supplemental declaration under subsection (7)(L)(B) of this section is
inconsistent with the information included  in the declaration or supplemental declaration in ac-
cordance with subsection (7)(g) of this section, an amendment to the declaration or supplemental
declaration and plat or supplemental plat approved by at least 75 percent of owners is required.
(11) The statement of an  interest in property other than fee simple submitted to the condomin-
ium form of ownership and any easements, rights or appurtenances  belonging to property submitted
to the condominium form of ownership, whether leasehold or fee simple, must include:
(a) A reference to the recording index numbers and date of recording of the  instrument creating
the interest; or
(b) A reference to the law, administrative rule, ordinance or regulation that creates the interest
if the interest is created under law, administrative  rule, ordinance or regulation and not recorded
in the office of the recording officer of the county in which the property is located.
SUBDIVIDING FOR DEVELOPMENT OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING
SECTION 15.
 ORS 92.090 is amended to read:
92.090. (1) Subdivision plat names shall be subject to the approval of the  county surveyor or, in
the case where there is no county surveyor, the county assessor.  No tentative subdivision plan or
subdivision plat of a subdivision shall be approved which bears a name similar to or  pronounced the
same as the name of any other subdivision in the same county, unless the land platted is contiguous
to and platted by the same party that platted  the subdivision bearing that name or unless the party
files and records the consent of the party that platted the  contiguous subdivision bearing that name.
All subdivision plats must continue the lot numbers and, if used, the  block numbers of the subdivi-
sion plat of the same  name last filed. On or after January 1, 1992, any subdivision submitted for final
approval shall not use  block numbers or letters unless such subdivision is a continued phase of a
previously recorded subdivision, bearing the same name, that has previously used block  numbers or
letters.
(2) No tentative plan for a proposed subdivision and no tentative plan for  a proposed partition
shall be approved unless:
(a) The streets and  roads are laid out so as to conform to the plats of subdivisions and partitions
already approved for adjoining property as to width, general direction and in all other respects  un-
less the city or county determines it is in the public interest to modify the street or road pattern.
(b) Streets and roads held for private use are clearly indicated on the tentative plan  and all
reservations or restrictions relating to such private roads and streets are set forth thereon.
(c) The tentative plan complies with  the applicable zoning ordinances and regulations and the
ordinances or regulations adopted under ORS 92.044 that  are then in effect for the city or county
within which the land described in the plan is situated.
(3) No plat of a proposed subdivision or partition shall be approved unless:
(a) Streets and roads for public use are dedicated without any reservation or  restriction other
than reversionary rights upon vacation of any such street or  road and easements for public or pri-
vate utilities.
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 19
(b) Streets and roads held for private use  and indicated on the tentative plan of such subdivision
or partition have been approved by the city or county.
(c) The subdivision or partition plat complies  with any applicable zoning ordinances and regu-
lations and any ordinance or regulation adopted under ORS 92.044 that are then in effect for  the
city or county within which the land described in the subdivision or partition plat is situated.
(d) The subdivision or partition  plat is in substantial conformity with the provisions of the ten-
tative plan for the subdivision or partition, as approved.
(e) The subdivision or partition plat contains a  donation to the public of all common improve-
ments, including but not limited to streets, roads, parks, sewage disposal and water  supply systems,
the donation of which was made a condition of the approval of the  tentative plan for the subdivision
or partition.
(f) Explanations of all  common improvements required as conditions of approval of the tentative
plan of the subdivision or partition have been recorded and referenced  on the subdivision or parti-
tion plat.
(4) Subject to  any standards and procedures adopted pursuant to ORS 92.044, no plat of a sub-
division shall be approved by a city or county unless the city or county has received  and accepted:
(a) A certification by a city-owned domestic water  supply system or by the owner of a privately
owned domestic water supply system, subject to regulation by the Public  Utility Commission of
Oregon, that water will be  available to the lot line of each and every lot depicted in the proposed
subdivision  plat;
(b) A bond, irrevocable letter of credit, contract  or other assurance by the subdivider to the city
or county that a domestic water supply system will be installed by or on  behalf of the subdivider
to the lot line of each and every lot depicted in the  proposed subdivision plat[ ; and the amount of
any such bond,  irrevocable letter of credit, contract or other assurance by the subdivider shall be ] in
an amount  determined by a registered professional engineer, subject to any change in such amount
as determined necessary by the city or county; or
(c) [ In lieu of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this  subsection, ] A statement that no domestic water
supply facility will be provided to the purchaser of any  lot depicted in the proposed subdivision plat,
even though a domestic water supply source may exist. A copy of any such statement, signed by  the
subdivider and indorsed by the city or county, shall be filed by the subdivider with the  Real Estate
Commissioner and shall be included by the commissioner in any public report  made for the subdi-
vision under ORS 92.385. If the making of a public report has been waived or  the subdivision is
otherwise exempt under the Oregon Subdivision Control Law, the subdivider shall  deliver a copy
of the statement to each prospective purchaser of a lot in the subdivision  at or prior to the signing
by the purchaser of the first  written agreement for the sale of the lot. The subdivider shall take a
signed receipt from the purchaser upon delivery of such a statement,  shall immediately send a copy
of the  receipt to the commissioner and shall keep any such receipt on file in this state, subject to
inspection by the commissioner, for a period of three years after the date the receipt is taken.
(5) Subject to  any standards and procedures adopted pursuant to ORS 92.044, no plat of a sub-
division shall be approved by a city or county unless the city or county has received  and accepted:
(a) A certification by a city-owned sewage disposal system or by the owner of a  privately owned
sewage disposal  system that is subject to regulation by the Public Utility Commission of Oregon that
a sewage disposal system will be available to the lot line  of each and every lot depicted in the
proposed subdivision plat;
(b) A bond, irrevocable letter of credit, contract  or other assurance by the subdivider to the city
or county that a sewage disposal system will be installed by or  on behalf of the subdivider to the
lot line of each and every lot depicted on  the proposed subdivision plat[ ; and the amount of such
bond, irrevocable letter of credit, contract or other assurance shall be ] in an amount  determined by
a registered professional engineer, subject to any  change in such amount as the city or county
considers necessary; or
(c) [ In lieu of  paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, ] A statement that no sewage disposal
facility will be provided to the purchaser of any lot depicted in the proposed subdivision  plat, where
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 20
the Department of Environmental Quality has approved the proposed method or an  alternative
method of sewage disposal for the subdivision in its evaluation report described in ORS  454.755
(1)(b). A copy of any such statement, signed by the subdivider and indorsed by  the city or county
shall be filed  by the subdivider with the Real Estate Commissioner and shall be included by the
commissioner in the public report made for the subdivision under  ORS 92.385. If the making of a
public report has been waived or the subdivision is  otherwise exempt under the Oregon Subdivision
Control Law, the subdivider shall deliver a copy  of the statement to each prospective purchaser of
a lot in the subdivision at or prior to  the signing by the purchaser of the first written agreement
for the sale of the  lot. The subdivider shall take a signed receipt from the purchaser upon delivery
of such a statement, shall immediately send  a copy of the receipt to the commissioner and shall keep
any such receipt on file  in this state, subject to inspection by the commissioner, for a period of three
years after the date the receipt is taken.
(6) A city or  county shall accept as other assurance, as used in subsections (4)(b) and
(5)(b) of this  section, one or more award letters from public funding sources made to a sub-
divider who is subdividing the property to develop affordable  housing, that is or will be sub-
ject to an affordability  restriction as defined in ORS 456.250 or an affordable housing
covenant as defined in ORS 456.270, if the awards total an amount greater than the  project
cost.
[(6)] (7)  Subject to any standards and procedures adopted pursuant to ORS  92.044, no plat of a
subdivision or partition located within the boundaries of an irrigation district, drainage  district,
water control district, water improvement district or  district improvement company shall be ap-
proved by a city or county unless the city or county has  received and accepted a certification from
the district or company that the subdivision or partition is either entirely excluded from  the district
or company or is included within the district or company for  purposes of receiving services and
subjecting the subdivision or partition to the fees and other charges of the district or company.
SINGLE ROOM OCCUPANCIES
SECTION 16. Section 17 of this 2023 Act and ORS 197.758 are added to and made a part
of ORS 197.286 to 197.314.
SECTION 17. (1) As used in  this section “single room occupancy” means a residential
development with no  fewer than four attached units that are independently rented and
lockable and provide living and sleeping space for the exclusive  use of an occupant, but re-
quire that the occupant share sanitary or food preparation  facilities with other units in the
occupancy.
(2) Within an urban growth boundary, each  local government shall allow the development
of a single room occupancy:
(a) With up to six units on each lot or  parcel zoned to allow for the development of a
detached single-family dwelling; and
(b) With the number of units consistent with the  density standards of a lot or parcel
zoned to allow for the development of residential dwellings with five or more units.
SECTION 18.  ORS 197.303, as amended by section 27, chapter 13, Oregon  Laws 2023 (Enrolled
House Bill 2001), is amended to read:
197.303. (1) As used in ORS 197.296 and this section, “needed housing” means  all housing on
land zoned for residential use or mixed residential and commercial use that  is determined to meet
the need shown for housing within an urban growth boundary at price ranges and rent  levels that
are affordable to households within the county with a variety of  incomes, including but not limited
to households with low incomes, very  low incomes and extremely low incomes, as those terms are
defined by the  United States Department of Housing and Urban Development under 42 U.S.C. 1437a.
“Needed housing” includes the following housing types:
(a) Attached and detached single-family  housing, middle housing types as described in ORS
197.758 and multiple family housing for both owner and renter occupancy;
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 21
(b) Government assisted housing;
(c) Mobile home or manufactured dwelling parks as provided in ORS 197.475 to 197.490;
(d) Manufactured homes on individual lots  planned and zoned for single-family residential use
that are in addition to lots within designated manufactured dwelling subdivisions;
(e) Agriculture workforce housing;
(f) Housing for individuals with a  variety of disabilities related to mobility or communications
that require accessibility features;
(g) Housing for older persons, as defined in ORS 659A.421; [ and]
(h) Housing for college or university students, if relevant to the region[ .]; and
(i) Single room occupancies as defined in section 17 of this 2023 Act.
(2) For the purpose of estimating housing needs, as described in ORS  197.296 (3)(b), Metro shall
adopt findings and perform an analysis that estimates each of the following factors:
(a) Projected needed housing units over the next 20 years;
(b) Current housing underproduction;
(c) Housing units needed for people experiencing homelessness; and
(d) Housing units projected to be converted into vacation homes or second  homes during the
next 20 years.
(3) At the  time Metro performs the analysis under subsection (2) of this section, Metro shall
allocate a housing need for each city within Metro.
(4) In making an allocation under subsection (3) of this section, Metro shall consider:
(a) The forecasted population growth under ORS 195.033 or 195.036;
(b) The forecasted regional job growth;
(c) An equitable statewide distribution of housing for income levels described  in section 2 (4) ,
chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 2001)  [ of this 2023 Act ].
(d) The estimates made under subsection (2) of this section; and
(e) The  purpose of the Oregon Housing Needs Analysis under section 1 (1) , chapter 13, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 2001)  [ of this 2023 Act ].
(5) Metro shall make the estimate described  in subsection (2) of this section using a shorter time
period than since the last  review under ORS 197.296 (2)(a)(B) if Metro finds that the shorter time
period will provide more accurate and reliable  data related to housing need. The shorter time period
may not be less than three years.
(6) Metro shall use data from a wider geographic area or use a time  period longer than the time
period described in subsection (2) of  this section if the analysis of a wider geographic area or the
use of a longer time period will provide more accurate,  complete and reliable data relating to trends
affecting housing need than an analysis performed pursuant to subsection (2) of  this section. Metro
must clearly describe  the geographic area, time frame and source of data used in an estimate per-
formed under this subsection.
(7) Subsection (1)(a)  and (d) of this section does not apply to a city with a population of less than
2,500.
(8) Metro may take an exception  under ORS 197.732 to the definition of “needed housing” in
subsection (1) of this section in the same manner that an exception may be taken under the goals.
SECTION 18a.
If House Bill 2889  becomes law, section 18 of this 2023 Act (amending ORS
197.303) is repealed and ORS 197.303, as amended by section 27, chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House Bill  2001), and section 14, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House
Bill 2889), is amended to read:
197.303. (1) As used  in ORS 197.296 and this section, “needed housing” means all housing on
land zoned for residential use  or mixed residential and commercial use that is determined to meet
the need shown  for housing within an urban growth boundary at price ranges and rent levels that
are affordable to households within the  county with a variety of incomes, including but not limited
to households with low incomes, very low incomes and extremely low  incomes, as those terms are
defined by the  United States Department of Housing and Urban Development under 42 U.S.C. 1437a.
“Needed housing” includes the following housing types:
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 22
(a) Attached and detached single-family housing, middle housing types  as described in ORS
197.758 and multiple family housing for both owner and renter occupancy;
(b) Government assisted housing;
(c) Mobile home or manufactured dwelling parks as provided in ORS 197.475 to 197.490;
(d) Manufactured homes on individual lots  planned and zoned for single-family residential use
that are in addition to lots within designated manufactured dwelling subdivisions; [ and]
(e) Agriculture workforce housing[ .]; and
(f) Single room occupancies as defined in section 17 of this 2023 Act.
(2) For the purpose of estimating housing needs, as described in ORS  197.296 (3)(b), Metro shall
adopt findings and perform an analysis that estimates each of the following factors:
(a) Projected needed housing units over the next 20 years;
(b) Current housing underproduction;
(c) Housing units needed for people experiencing homelessness; and
(d) Housing units projected  to be converted into vacation homes or second homes during the
next 20 years.
(3) Metro shall make the estimate described  in subsection (2) of this section using a shorter time
period than since the last review under ORS 197.296 (2)(a)(B) if Metro finds  that the shorter time
period will provide more accurate and reliable  data related to housing need. The shorter time period
may not be less than three years.
(4) Metro shall use data from a wider geographic area or use a time  period longer than the time
period described in subsection (2) of this section if the analysis of a  wider geographic area or the
use of a longer time period will provide more accurate,  complete and reliable data relating to trends
affecting housing need than  an analysis performed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. Metro
must clearly describe the geographic area, time frame and source of data used in an  estimate per-
formed under this subsection.
(5) Subsection (1)(a)  and (d) of this section does not apply to a city with a population of less than
2,500.
(6) Metro may take an exception under ORS 197.732 to the  definition of “needed housing” in
subsection (1) of this section in the same manner that an exception may be taken under the goals.
SECTION 19.
 Section 23, chapter 13, Oregon  Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 2001), is amended
to read:
Sec. 23.  (1) As used in ORS 197.286 to 197.314, and except as provided in  subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) “Needed housing” means housing by  affordability level, as described in section 2 (4) , chapter
13, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House  Bill 2001)  [ of this 2023 Act ], type, characteristics and lo-
cation that is necessary to accommodate the city’s allocated housing need over the 20-year  planning
period in effect when the city’s housing capacity is determined.
(b) “Needed housing” includes the following housing types:
(A) Detached single-family  housing, middle housing types as described in ORS 197.758 and
multifamily housing that is owned or rented;
(B) Government assisted housing;
(C) Mobile home or manufactured dwelling parks as provided in ORS 197.475 to 197.490;
(D) Manufactured homes on individual lots planned and zoned for single-family  residential use
that are in addition to lots within designated manufactured dwelling subdivisions;
(E) Housing for agricultural workers;
(F) Housing for individuals with a variety of disabilities, related to  mobility or communications
that require accessibility features;
(G) Housing for older persons, as defined in ORS 659A.421; [ and]
(H) Housing for college or university students, if relevant to the region[ .]; and
(I) Single room occupancies as defined in section 17 of this 2023 Act.
(2) Subsection (1)(b)(A) and (D) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A city with a population of less than 2,500.
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 23
(b) A county with a population of less than 15,000.
(3) At the time that a city is required to inventory its buildable lands under ORS  197.297 (1) or
section 21 or 22 , chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House  Bill 2001) [of this 2023 Act ], the
city shall determine its needed housing under this section.
(4) In determining  needed housing the city must demonstrate that the projected housing types,
characteristics and locations are:
(a) Attainable  for the allocated housing need by income, including consideration of publicly
supported housing;
(b) Appropriately responsive to current and projected market trends; and
(c) Responsive to the factors in ORS 197.290 (2)(b) to (d).
SITING DUPLEXES
SECTION 20.
 ORS 197.758 is amended to read:
197.758. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Cottage clusters” means groupings of no  fewer than four detached housing units per acre
with a footprint of less than 900 square feet each and that include a common courtyard.
(b) “Middle housing” means:
(A) Duplexes;
(B) Triplexes;
(C) Quadplexes;
(D) Cottage clusters; and
(E) Townhouses.
(c) “Townhouses” means a dwelling unit constructed in a row of two  or more attached units,
where each dwelling unit is located on an individual  lot or parcel and shares at least one common
wall with an adjacent unit.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, each city with a  population of 25,000 or
more and each county or city within a metropolitan service district shall allow the  development of:
(a) All middle housing types in areas  zoned for residential use that allow for the development
of detached single-family dwellings; and
(b) A duplex on each lot or parcel zoned for  residential use that allows for the development of
detached single-family dwellings.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, each city not within a  metropolitan
service district with a population of [ more than 10,000 ] 2,500 or greater and less than 25,000 shall
allow the development of a duplex on each lot or parcel zoned for  residential use that allows for the
development of detached  single-family dwellings. Nothing in this subsection prohibits a local gov-
ernment from allowing middle housing types in addition to duplexes.
(4) This section does not apply to:
(a) Cities with a population of 1,000 or fewer;
(b) Lands not within an urban growth boundary;
(c) Lands that are not incorporated and also  lack sufficient urban services, as defined in ORS
195.065;
(d) Lands that are not zoned for residential use, including lands zoned primarily for commercial,
industrial, agricultural or public uses; or
(e) Lands that are  not incorporated and are zoned under an interim zoning designation that
maintains the land’s potential for planned urban development.
(5) Local governments may  regulate siting and design of middle housing required to be permitted
under this section, provided that the regulations do not,  individually or cumulatively, discourage the
development of all middle housing types permitted in the area through unreasonable  costs or delay.
Local governments may  regulate middle housing to comply with protective measures adopted pur-
suant to statewide land use planning goals.
(6) This section does not prohibit local governments from permitting:
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 24
(a) Single-family dwellings in areas zoned to allow for single-family dwellings; or
(b) Middle housing in areas not required under this section.
(7) A local government that amends its comprehensive plan or land use  regulations re-
lating to allowing additional middle housing is not required to consider whether the amend-
ments significantly affect an existing or planned transportation facility.
SECTION 21.
 Section 3, chapter 639, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1)  Notwithstanding ORS 197.646, a local government shall adopt land use regulations
or amend its comprehensive  plan to implement [ section 2 of this 2019 Act ] ORS 197.758 no later than:
(a) June 30, 2021, for each city subject to [ section 2 (3) of  this 2019 Act; or ] ORS 197.758 (3)
(2021 Edition);
(b) June 30, 2022, for each local government subject to [ section 2 (2) of  this 2019 Act. ] ORS
197.758 (2); or
(c) June 30, 2025, for each city subject to ORS 197.758 (3), as amended  by section 20 of
this 2023 Act.
(2) The Land Conservation and Development Commission, with the assistance of  the Building
Codes Division of the Department of Consumer and  Business Services, shall develop a model middle
housing ordinance no later than December 31, 2020.
(3) A local government that has not acted within the time provided under subsection (1) of this
section shall directly apply the model ordinance developed by the commission under subsection  (2)
of this section under  ORS 197.646 (3) until the local government acts as described in subsection (1)
of this section.
(4) In  adopting regulations or amending a comprehensive plan under this section, a local gov-
ernment shall  consider ways to increase the affordability of middle housing by considering ordi-
nances and policies that include but are not limited to:
(a) Waiving or deferring system development charges;
(b) Adopting  or amending criteria for property tax exemptions under ORS 307.515 to 307.523,
307.540 to 307.548 or 307.651 to 307.687 or property tax freezes under ORS 308.450 to 308.481; and
(c) Assessing a construction tax under ORS 320.192 and 320.195.
[(5) When a local government makes a legislative decision to amend its  comprehensive plan or land
use regulations to allow middle housing in areas zoned for residential  use that allow for detached
single-family dwellings, the local  government is not required to consider whether the amendments sig-
nificantly affect an existing or planned transportation facility. ]
SECTION 22.
 Section 4, chapter 639, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) [ Notwithstanding section 3 (1) or (3) of this 2019 Act, ] The  Department of Land Con-
servation and Development may grant to a local government that is subject to [ section 2 of  this 2019
Act] ORS 197.758 an extension of  the time allowed to adopt land use regulations or amend its
comprehensive plan under section 3 , chapter 639, Oregon Laws 2019  [ of this 2019 Act ].
(2) An extension  under this section may be applied only to specific areas where the local gov-
ernment has identified water, sewer, storm drainage or transportation services that  are [ either] sig-
nificantly deficient [ or are  expected to be significantly deficient before December 31, 2023, ] and for
which the local government has established a  plan of actions that will remedy the deficiency in
those services that is approved  by the department. The extension may not extend beyond the date
that the local government intends to correct the deficiency under the plan.
(3) In areas where the extension under this section does not apply, the local government  shall
apply its own land use regulations consistent with section 3 (1) , chapter 639, Oregon Laws 2019,
[of this 2019 Act ] or the model ordinance  developed under section 3 (2) , chapter 639, Oregon Laws
2019 [ of this 2019 Act ].
(4) A request for an extension by a local government must be filed with the department no later
than:
(a) December 31, 2020, for a city subject to [ section 2 (3) of this 2019  Act. ] ORS 197.758 (3) (2021
Edition).
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 25
(b) June 30, 2021, for a local government subject to [ section 2 (2) of  this 2019 Act. ] ORS 197.758
(2).
(c) June 30, 2024, for  each city subject to ORS 197.758 (3), as amended by section 20 of
this 2023 Act.
(5) The department shall grant or deny a request for an extension under this section:
(a) Within 90 days of receipt of a complete request from a city  subject to [ section 2 (3) of this
2019 Act. ] ORS 197.758 (3).
(b) Within 120 days of receipt of a complete request from  a local government subject to [ section
2 (2) of this 2019 Act. ] ORS 197.758 (2).
(6) The department shall adopt rules regarding the form and  substance of a local government’s
application for an extension under this section. The department may include rules regarding:
(a) Defining the affected areas;
(b) Calculating deficiencies of water, sewer, storm drainage or transportation services;
(c) Service deficiency levels required to qualify for the extension;
(d) The components and timing of a remediation plan necessary to qualify for an extension;
(e) Standards for evaluating applications; and
(f) Establishing deadlines and components for the approval of a plan of action.
SECTION 23.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Land Conservation  and Development, for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,250,000, to  provide grants to
local governments to assist them in amending their comprehensive plans as required under
section 3 (1)(c), chapter 639, Oregon Laws 2019.
REMOVING RECORDED DISCRIMINATORY PROVISIONS
SECTION 24.
Section 25 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 93.
SECTION 25. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 94.590, 94.625, 100.110, 100.135, 100.411  or 100.413
or any requirement of the declaration or bylaws, an amendment to the declaration or bylaws
of a planned community or  condominium is effective and may be made and recorded in the
county clerk’s office of a county in which any portion of the property is situated without the
vote of the owners or the board members and without the prior approval of the Real  Estate
Commissioner, county assessor or any other person if:
(a) The amendment is made  to conform the declarations or bylaws to the requirements
of ORS 93.270 (2); and
(b) The amendment is signed by the president and secretary  of the homeowners associ-
ation.
(2) The first page or cover  sheet of an instrument amending the declaration or bylaws
must comply with the recording requirements  of ORS chapter 205 and must be in substan-
tially the following form:
AMENDMENT OF [DECLARATION/BYLAWS]
TO COMPLY WITH ORS 93.270 (2).
Pursuant to this section, the undersigned states:
1. The undersigned  are the president and secretary for the [homeowners/condominium
owners] association 
 (name) in  County.
2. This document amends the [declaration/bylaws] of the association.
3. The [declaration was/bylaws were] first recorded under  instrument number (or book
and page number) 
 recorded on .
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 26
4. The [declaration was/bylaws were] most  recently amended or restated, if ever, under
instrument number (or book and page number)  recorded on
.
5. The undersigned have  determined that the current [declarations/bylaws] of the
[planned community/condominium], as last amended or revised, may fail to  comply with ORS
93.270. The following amendments to the [declaration/bylaws] remove provisions that are not
allowed and are unenforceable under ORS 93.270 (2). No other changes to the document  are
being made except as may be necessary to correct scriveners’ errors or to  conform format
and style.
6. Under this section, a vote of the association is not required.
7. The description of the real property in 
 County affected by this
document is:
Dated this  day of  20 .
Name: 
President,  (association name)
Address: 
Phone No.: 
Dated this  day of  20 .
Name: 
Secretary,  (association name)
Address: 
Phone No.: 
STATE OF OREGON )
) ss.
County of )
The foregoing instrument was acknowledged  before me this  day of 
20  by  and .
Notary Public for Oregon
My commission expires: 
(3) If an instrument recorded under this section affects a condominium, the  condomin-
ium association shall file  a copy of the recorded instrument with the Real Estate Commis-
sioner.
SECTION 26.  Section 4, chapter 67, Oregon Laws 2021, as  amended by section 5b, chapter 367,
Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) On  or before December 31, [ 2022] 2024, each homeowners association of a planned
community first established before September  1, 2021,  shall review [ each governing document
currently binding on the planned community, or  the lots or the lot owners within ] the declaration and
bylaws of the planned community and shall:
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 27
(a) Amend  [ or restate ] each document as necessary to remove all restrictions against the use of
the community or the lots not allowed under ORS 93.270 (2)  as provided under section  25 of this
2023 Act; or
(b) Execute and record a [ declaration] certification that the homeowners association has re-
viewed the [ governing documents binding on ] declaration and bylaws of the planned community and
that the documents do not contain any restriction, rule or regulation against the use  of the com-
munity or the lots by a person or  group of persons because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual ori-
entation, gender identity, national origin, marital status,  familial status, source of income, disability
or the number of individuals, including  family members, persons of close affinity or unrelated per-
sons, who are simultaneously occupying a dwelling unit within occupancy limits.
(2) [ Notwithstanding ORS 94.590 or 94.625 or any requirement  of the declaration or bylaws, an
amendment to or a restatement of  the declaration or bylaws under subsection (1)(a) of this section is
effective and ] A certification under subsection (1)(b) of this section:
(a) May be recorded without the vote of the owners or the board members [ if the amendment
or restatement includes a certification signed by  the president and secretary of the homeowners asso-
ciation that the  amended or restated declaration or bylaws does not change that document except as
required under this section and as may be necessary to correct  scriveners’ errors or to conform format
and style. ]; and
(b) Must be in substantially the following form:
CERTIFICATION OF COMPLIANCE WITH ORS 93.270 (2).
Pursuant to section 4, chapter 67, Oregon Laws 2021, the undersigned states:
1. The undersigned are the president and secretary for the  homeowners association
 (name) in  County.
2. The declaration was first recorded under instrument  number (or book and page num-
ber)  recorded on . The declaration  was most re-
cently amended or restated, if ever,  under instrument number  recorded
on .
3. The bylaws were first recorded, if ever,  under instrument number (or book and page
number)  recorded on . The bylaws were most re-
cently amended or restated, if ever,  under instrument number  recorded
on .
4. The undersigned have determined that the current  declarations and bylaws of the
planned community, as last amended or revised, conform with ORS 93.270 (2) and  that there
are no provisions  that would restrict the use of the community or the lots or units of the
community because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national
origin, marital status, familial status, source of income, disability  or the number of individ-
uals, including family members, persons of close affinity or  unrelated persons, who are si-
multaneously occupying a dwelling unit within occupancy limits.  Any such provision that
may inadvertently remain is void and unenforceable.
5. Under this section, a vote of the association is not required.
6. The description of the  real property in 
 County affected by this
document is:
Dated this  day of  20 .
Name: 
President,  (association name)
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 28
Dated this  day of  20 .
Name: 
Secretary,  (association name)
STATE OF OREGON )
) ss.
County of )
The foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me  this  day of 
20  by  and .
Notary Public for Oregon
My commission expires: 
SECTION 27.  Section 6, chapter 67, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended  by section 5c, chapter 367,
Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) On or before December 31, [ 2022] 2024, each association  of a condominium first es-
tablished before September 1, 2021,  that includes units used for residential purposes shall review
[each governing document currently binding on  the condominium or the units or unit owners within ]
the declaration and bylaws of  the condominium and shall:
(a) Amend  [ or restate ] each document as necessary to remove all restrictions against the use of
the condominium or the units not allowed under ORS  93.270 (2) as provided under section 25 of
this 2023 Act ; or
(b) Execute and record  a [ declaration] certification that the association has reviewed the [ gov-
erning documents binding on ] declaration and bylaws of  the condominium and that the documents
do not contain any  restriction, rule or regulation against the use of the condominium or the units
by a person  or group of persons because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, national origin, marital status, familial status, source of income,  disability or the number
of individuals, including family members, persons of close  affinity or unrelated persons, who are si-
multaneously occupying a dwelling unit within occupancy limits.
(2) [ Notwithstanding ORS 100.110, 100.135, 100.413 or any requirement of the declaration or by-
laws, an amendment to or a restatement of the declaration or bylaws  under this section, upon sub-
mission and approval of the Real Estate Commissioner under ORS 100.123, 100.125, 100.668  and
100.675, is effective and ] A certification under subsection (1)(b) of this section:
(a) May be recorded without the vote of the owners  or the board members [ if the amended or
restated declaration or bylaws includes a  certification signed by the president and secretary of the as-
sociation that the amended or restated declaration or bylaws does not change that document  except as
required under this section and as may be necessary to correct  scriveners’ errors or to conform format
and style. ]; and
(b) Must be in substantially the following form:
CERTIFICATION OF COMPLIANCE WITH ORS 93.270 (2).
Pursuant to section 6, chapter 67, Oregon Laws 2021, the undersigned states:
1. The undersigned are the president and secretary for  the condominium owners associ-
ation 
 (name) in  County.
2. The declaration was first recorded under  instrument number (or book and page num-
ber)  recorded on . The declaration was most re-
cently amended or restated, if ever,  under instrument number  recorded
on .
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 29
3. The bylaws were first recorded, if ever,  under instrument number (or book and page
number)  recorded on . The bylaws  were most re-
cently amended or restated, if ever,  under instrument number  recorded
on .
4. The undersigned have determined that the current  declarations and bylaws of the
condominium, as last amended or revised, conform with ORS  93.270 (2) and that there are
no provisions that would restrict the use  of the community or the lots or units of the com-
munity because of race, color, religion, sex,  sexual orientation, gender identity, national or-
igin, marital status, familial status, source of  income, disability or the number of individuals,
including family members, persons of close affinity or unrelated persons, who  are simul-
taneously occupying a dwelling unit  within occupancy limits. Any such provision that may
inadvertently remain is void and unenforceable.
5. Under this section, a vote of the association is not required.
6. The description of the real property in 
 County affected by this
document is:
Dated this  day of  20 .
Name: 
President,  (association name)
Dated this  day of  20 .
Name: 
Secretary,  (association name)
STATE OF OREGON )
) ss.
County of )
The foregoing instrument was acknowledged  before me this  day of 
20  by  and .
Notary Public for Oregon
My commission expires: 
SECTION 28. (1) The amendments to sections  4 and 6, chapter 67, Oregon Laws 2021, by
sections 26 and 27 of this 2023 Act are intended  to extend the deadline for compliance with
those sections and to clarify the process by which associations may comply  with those
sections.
(2) Sections 4 and 6, chapter 67,  Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by sections 26 and 27 of
this 2023 Act, do not apply to a planned community or condominium that:
(a) Was established on or after September 1, 2021; or
(b) Complied with the requirements of section 4 or  6, chapter 67, Oregon Laws 2021, that
were in effect before the  effective date of this 2023 Act, notwithstanding the former deadline
for compliance of December 31, 2022.
AFFORDABLE HOUSING ON PUBLIC UTILITY LANDS
SECTION 29.
(1) As used in this section, “affordable housing” means affordable housing
as defined in ORS 197.308 or publicly supported housing as defined in ORS 456.250.
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 30
(2)(a) To facilitate the development of affordable housing in this state,  the Public Utility
Commission may allow a public utility  to sell, or to convey at below market price or as a gift,
the public utility’s  interest in real property for the purpose of the real property being used
for the development of affordable housing.
(b) The instrument that conveys, or  contracts to convey, the public utility’s interest in
the real property must include an affordable housing covenant as  provided in ORS 456.270 to
456.295.
(3) A public utility may not recover costs from customers for  selling, or conveying at
below market price or as a gift, the public utility’s interest in  real property under this sec-
tion.
HOUSING SUPPORT FOR LOW-INCOME COLLEGE STUDENTS
SECTION 30. The Department of  Human Services shall provide financial support to
nonprofit organizations providing affordable housing support to low-income college  students
across this state in accordance with the department’s self-sufficiency programs.
SECTION 31. Section 30 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 32. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Human  Services, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $4,000,000 to provide financial support to nonprofit or-
ganizations under section 30 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 32a.
Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for self-sufficiency
programs, is increased by $244,963 to administer financial support  to nonprofit organizations
pursuant to the provisions of section 30 of this 2023 Act.
COMMUNITY HOUSING SUPPORTING AGRICULTURAL EMPLOYEES
SECTION 33. Section 34 of this 2023 Act is  added to and made a part of ORS 456.548 to
456.725.
SECTION 34. (1) As used in this section, “community  housing supporting agricultural
employees” means a housing development that:
(a) Is within an urban growth boundary;
(b) Is within 20 miles of significant agricultural employment as  identified by the Housing
and Community Services Department;
(c) Is promoted for residential use by agricultural employees and  developed with amen-
ities suitable for agricultural employees and their families;
(d) Consists of a multifamily dwelling or a cluster  of buildings, including manufactured,
prefabricated or modular housing, housing  produced through a three-dimensional printing
process or other housing developed using innovative construction types; and
(e)(A) Is subject to an affordable housing covenant requiring  that the units are main-
tained for a period of no less than 60 years as affordable to rent for low income households,
as described in ORS 456.270 to 456.295;
(B) Is operated as a consumer housing cooperative; or
(C) Is operated under a model approved  by the department designed to preserve
affordability or control of the property by its residents.
(2) The Housing and Community Services Department  shall provide one or more grants
to qualified housing sponsors  for the purposes of developing community housing supporting
agricultural employees.
(3) In awarding grants under this section, the department shall prioritize applications:
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 31
(a) From a developer that is a  nonprofit housing corporation that serves agricultural
workers;
(b) From a developer that is a nonprofit that  promotes housing for agricultural employ-
ees or other  needs of agricultural employees, or from a developer that has entered into a
partnership with a nonprofit housing  corporation that serves agricultural workers for the
purposes of developing the community housing;
(c) Where other funding for the housing development has been  dedicated or can be lev-
eraged by the grant;
(d) Where the housing development will be located close to significant agricultural em-
ployment; or
(e) Where the housing  development will include or will be near specific characteristics
or amenities designed to support or attract agricultural employees and their families.
(4) Grants awarded under this section may be used for any project costs for  the devel-
opment or predevelopment of the community housing supporting agricultural employees.
(5) A qualified housing sponsor receiving grants  under this section shall agree to provide
information to the department to report to an appropriate interim  committee of the Legis-
lative Assembly, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, on the use of the grant on or  before
September 15, 2027.
SECTION 35. Section 34 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 36. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, to award and administer
grants under section 34 of this 2023 Act.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT HOUSING SUPPORT
SECTION 37.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services, in consultation with
the Department of Land Conservation and Development  and the Housing and Community
Services Department, shall provide grants to  councils of governments, as defined in ORS
294.900, and economic development districts to support housing and  community development
capacity within cities and counties in this state and within  the nine federally recognized In-
dian tribes in this state.
(2) Councils of governments and economic  development districts receiving grants under
this section shall partner  and consult with local governments, developers, financiers, the
Department of Land Conservation and Development, the Housing and  Community Services
Department, other relevant state agencies and other interested  public and private partners
to enable local governments throughout the  region to encourage community development
and the development of infrastructure and needed housing, as  defined in section 23, chapter
13, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 2001), by:
(a) Bridging any information gaps;
(b) Identifying and securing needed resources, including infrastructure and community
facilities;
(c) Connecting producers of needed housing with consumers of needed housing; and
(d) Working with representatives of historically underrepresented groups  to overcome
community-specific barriers to obtaining housing.
SECTION 38.
Section 37 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2034.
SECTION 39. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, to provide  grants under
section 37 of this 2023 Act.
AFFORDABLE HOMEOWNERSHIP REVOLVING LOAN FUND
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 32
SECTION 40. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall make a grant
to the Network for Oregon Affordable Housing (NOAH) to  establish a revolving loan fund
that will allow a first-time home buyer who is purchasing  a home, including a share of a
cooperative or a condominium unit, in which the purchaser’s equity will be  limited, to es-
tablish equity at a  faster rate while making monthly payments similar to those described in
subsection (3)(a)(A) of this subsection.  The department may not make a grant under this
section until NOAH has demonstrated that it has dedicated to a loan fund described in  this
section no less than $7,500,000 of additional private moneys.
(2) Loans made from the loan fund must be used  for the purchase of a dwelling that is
subject to an affordability restriction, such as  a restriction as described in ORS 456.270 to
456.295, that:
(a) Has the effect of limiting the purchaser’s ability to  gain equity from the appreciation
of the dwelling’s value; and
(b) Requires that the purchaser be a low income household as defined in ORS 456.270.
(3) Loans made from the loan fund must:
(a) Be made only to applicants  that have met with an approved or certified housing
counseling agency, as described in  24 C.F.R. 214 subpart B, and have a first-time home buyer
program offered by the agency;
(b) Have a term of 20 years or less; and
(c) Have a fixed interest rate that is not more than the greater of:
(A) The rate that would allow monthly  amortized principal and interest payments under
the term of the loan to be the amount  that would result from a 30-year fixed-rate amortized
mortgage at the  national current average rate as published by a reputable financial source;
or
(B) 0.5 percent.
SECTION 41.
Section 40 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 42. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $7,500,000, to make  a grant under sec-
tion 40 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 43. On or before September  15, 2025, and on or before September 15, 2027, the
Housing and Community Services  Department shall provide a report to an appropriate in-
terim committee of the Legislative Assembly, in the  manner provided in ORS 192.245, on the
use of the loan funds described in section 40 of this 2023 Act, as reported to  the department
by the Network for Oregon Affordable Housing (NOAH).
AFFORDABLE HOUSING LOAN GUARANTEE FUND
SECTION 44. Section 45 of  this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 458.
SECTION 45. (1) The Housing  and Community Services Department shall provide grants
to one or more nonprofit corporations to develop a fund.
(2) The moneys in the  fund may be used only to guarantee the repayment of loans to fi-
nance the construction of housing subject to an affordable housing covenant for low  or
moderate income households, as described in ORS 456.270 to 456.295 and as further defined
by the Housing and Community Services Department by rule.
(3) The term of a loan guaranteed under this section may not exceed five years.
(4) The  department and the state are not guarantors of any loan guaranteed by a
nonprofit corporation under this section.
(5) To be eligible for a grant under this section, a nonprofit corporation must:
(a) Be exempt from income taxes under  section 501(c)(3) or (4) of the Internal Revenue
Code; and
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 33
(b) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the corporation  is a commu-
nity development financial institution that operates statewide to  support investment in the
construction of affordable housing.
SECTION 46. Section 45 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 47. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $20,000,000 to provide grants under
section 45 of this 2023 Act.
HOUSING AND COMMUNITY SERVICES DEPARTMENT ADMINISTRATION
SECTION 47a. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Housing and Community Services Department by section 1, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5511), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, is in-
creased by $529,802, for purposes of administering sections 34,  37, 40, 43 and 45 of this 2023
Act.
EMERGENCY HOUSING ASSISTANCE FOR COMPANION ANIMALS
SECTION 48.  ORS 458.650 is amended to read:
458.650. (1) The Housing and Community  Services Department shall administer the Emergency
Housing Account to assist homeless  individuals and individuals who are at risk of becoming
homeless, through  means including the emergency housing assistance program and the state
homeless assistance program.  Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a) of this section, the state homeless
assistance program shall serve individuals experiencing homelessness, especially  unsheltered
homelessness, without respect to income.
(2) The  Oregon Housing Stability Council shall develop a policy for the use of program funds
with the advice of:
(a) Persons who have experienced housing instability;
(b) Tribes;
(c) The Community Action Partnership of Oregon;
(d) Continuums of care, as defined in 24 C.F.R. part 578;
(e) Local governments;
(f) Nonprofit organizations;
(g) Homeless services providers;
(h) Culturally specific organizations;
(i) Housing providers;
(j) Veterans’ services organizations; and
(k) Other entities identified by the department by rule.
(3) The policy under subsection (2) of this section  shall direct that program funds shall be used:
(a) To provide to low  and very low income individuals, including but not limited to individuals
more than 65 years of age, persons with disabilities, agricultural workers and Native Americans:
(A) Emergency shelters and attendant services;
(B) Transitional housing  services designed to assist individuals to make the transition from
homelessness to permanent housing and economic independence;
(C) Supportive housing services to enable individuals to continue living in their own homes  or
to provide  in-home services for such individuals for whom suitable programs do not exist in their
geographic area;
(D) Programs that provide emergency payment of home payments, rents or utilities; [ or]
(E) Support for individuals with companion animals, as defined in ORS 401.977, that in-
cludes:
(i) Food for both companion animals and their owners;
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 34
(ii) Crates or kennels on-site or off-site that are easily accessible  to the companion ani-
mal owners;
(iii) Basic veterinary services, including behavioral services; and
(iv) Rules of conduct and responsibility regarding companion animals  and their owners;
or
[(E)] (F)  Some or all of the needs described in subparagraphs  (A) to [ (D)] (E) of this paragraph.
(b) To align with federal strategies and resources that are available to prevent  and end
homelessness, including the requirement of providing culturally responsive services  and using
evidence-based and emerging practices  effective in ending homelessness, including practices unique
to rural communities.
(4)(a) The council shall require as a condition of awarding a grant  that the organization dem-
onstrate to the satisfaction of the council that the organization:
(A) Has the capacity to deliver any service proposed by the organization;
(B) Is a culturally  responsive organization or is engaged in a process to become a culturally
responsive organization;
(C) Engages with culturally specific organizations; and
(D) Supports local homelessness system planning efforts.
(b) Any funds granted under this section may not be used to replace existing funds. Funds
granted under this section may be used to supplement  existing funds. An organization may use funds
to support existing programs or to establish new programs.
(5) The department may expend funds from the account for:
(a) The administration of the account as provided for in the  legislatively approved budget, as
that term is defined in ORS 291.002, for the department in  support of directing a statewide policy
on homelessness that ensures use of evidence-based  and emerging practices, service equity in fund-
ing and local planning processes.
(b) The development of technical assistance and training resources  for organizations developing
and operating emergency shelters as defined in ORS 197.782 and transitional housing  accommo-
dations as described in ORS 197.746.
(6) The department shall utilize outcome-oriented contracting processes and  evidence-based and
emerging practices for account  program funds, including evidence-based and emerging practices for
serving rural communities.
(7) Twenty-five percent of  moneys deposited in the account pursuant to ORS 294.187 are dedi-
cated to the emergency housing assistance program for assistance to veterans who are homeless  or
at risk of becoming homeless.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 49.
The unit captions used in this 2023 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
OPERATIVE AND EFFECTIVE DATES
SECTION 50. Sections 2, 17, 29 and 30 of this 2023 Act and the amendments to ORS 92.090,
94.550, 100.015, 100.022, 100.105, 100.110, 100.115, 197.303, 197.830, 215.427 and 227.178 and  sec-
tion 23, chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 2001), by  sections 3 to 5, 9 to 15,
18 and 19 of this 2023 Act become operative on January 1, 2024.
SECTION 50a.  If House Bill 2889 becomes law, section 50 of this 2023  Act is amended to read:
Sec. 50.  Sections 2, 17, 29 and 30 of this 2023 Act and the amendments to ORS  92.090, 94.550,
100.015, 100.022, 100.105, 100.110, 100.115, 197.303, 197.830, 215.427 and 227.178 and section 23,
chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 2001), by sections 3 to 5, 9 to 15, [ 18] 18a and
19 of this 2023 Act become operative on January 1, 2024.
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 35
SECTION 51. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 14, 2023
Repassed by House June 25, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3395 (HB 3395-B) Page 36